Washington statutes.
RCW 14.07.010

General powers—Municipal purpose and public use.

Any city, town, port district or county is hereby authorized and empowered by and through their appropriate corporate authorities to acquire, maintain and operate, within or without the boundaries of the counties in which such city, town or port district is situated, sites and other facilities for landings, terminals, housing, repair and care of dirigibles, airplanes, and seaplanes, and seaplanes for the aerial transportation of persons, property and mail or for use of military and naval aircraft, either jointly with another city, town, port district, county, the state of Washington, or the United States of America or severally, and the same is hereby declared to be a municipal purpose and a public use.

[ 1941 c 21 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2722-8. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 3 s 1; 1929 c 93 s 1; 1919 c 48 s 1.]